Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2004.06
Capitol Security Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

The Capitol Security Revolving Fund is created. The fund shall be established within the Nebraska State Patrol and administered by the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety. The fund shall consist of fund transfers made each fiscal year from the State Building Revolving Fund, as authorized by the Legislature through the budget process, and any other revenue received by the state capitol security division of the patrol from separate security agreements with state agencies. The Capitol Security Revolving Fund shall only be used to pay the non-general-fund costs associated with the operation of the state capitol security division. Any money in the Capitol Security Revolving Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2007, LB322, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.